Tennessee, session 114, SB2418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Contingent fee" means a fee that is contingent on the outcome of the
matter for which the service is rendered; and
(2) "Political subdivision" means a political or taxing subdivision of this
state, including counties, cities, metropolitan governments, municipal and quasi-
municipal corporations, boards, commissions, authorities, councils, committees,
subcommittees, and other subordinate groups or administrative units thereof,
receiving or expending, and supported by, in whole or in part, public funds.
(b) A political subdivision may only enter into a contingent fee contract for legal
services if the governing body of the political subdivision:
(1) Calls a public meeting in accordance with title 8, chapter 44, part 1 for
the purpose of considering the contract and provides in the notice of the meeting:
(A) The reasons for pursuing the matter that is the subject of the
legal services being procured and the desired outcome of pursuing the
matter;
(B) The qualifications, experience, and competence of the
attorney or law firm proposed for retention by the governing body;
SB2418
011858
- 1 -

(C) The nature of the relationship, if any, between the political
subdivision or governing body and the attorney or law firm that is
proposed for retention;
(D) The reasons the legal services cannot be adequately
performed by the attorneys and supporting personnel of the political
subdivision;
(E) The reasons the legal services cannot be reasonably
procured under a contract providing for an hourly rate payment structure
as opposed to a contingent fee structure; and
(F) An explanation as to why a contingent fee contract for legal
services is in the best interest of the residents of the political subdivision;
(2) Makes a written finding that:
(A) There is a substantial need for the legal services that are the
subject of the proposed contingent fee contract;
(B) The legal services cannot be adequately performed by the
attorneys and supporting personnel of the political subdivision; and
(C) The legal services cannot reasonably be obtained from
attorneys under a contract providing for an hourly rate payment structure
due to the nature of the legal matter that is the subject of the contract or
because the political subdivision does not have the funds necessary to
pay the estimated cost of legal services provided under a contract at an
hourly rate; and
(3) Approves the contract in a public meeting after discussion and
consideration of the items described in subdivision (b)(1).
(c)
- 2 - 011858

(1) Before a contingent fee contract for legal services proposed by a
political subdivision pursuant to subsection (b) is executed, the political
subdivision shall obtain approval of the contract by the attorney general and
reporter. The political subdivision shall provide to the attorney general and
reporter:
(A) A copy of the proposed contract;
(B) A description of the legal matter that is the subject of the
proposed contract;
(C) A copy of the notice issued pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), the
date such noticed was issued, and a description of the method for
providing such notice; and
(D) A copy of the written findings made pursuant to subdivision
(b)(2).
(2) Within ninety (90) days after the political subdivision has provided the
attorney general and reporter with the information required under subdivision
(c)(1), the attorney general and reporter shall:
(A) Approve the contract; or
(B) Refuse to approve the contract and provide the political
subdivision with one (1) of the following reasons for the refusal to
approve:
(i) The legal matter that is the subject of the contract
presents one (1) or more questions of law or fact that are in
common with a matter that has already been adjudicated or that
the state is currently litigating;
- 3 - 011858

(ii) Pursuit of the legal matter by the political subdivision
will not promote the just and efficient resolution of the matter; or
(iii) The contract does not comply with the Tennessee
rules of professional conduct for attorneys adopted by the
Tennessee supreme court.
(3) If the attorney general has not taken action on a contract pursuant to
subdivision (c)(2) within ninety (90) days after receipt of the proposed contract,
such contract is deemed approved.
(d) In a judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding in which a political subdivision is
represented by an attorney providing legal services under a contingent fee contract for
legal services that was not approved in accordance with this section, the attorney
general and reporter may intervene in such proceeding and request that the proceeding
be dismissed. If the court or quasi-judicial body concludes that the contract for legal
services was not approved in accordance with this section, the court or quasi-judicial
body shall dismiss the matter without prejudice.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to contracts entered into, amended, or revised after July 1, 2026.
- 4 - 011858